Utah statutes.
4-36-5.   Applications for assistance.

Within the meaning of Article VI (b) or VIII (a), a request or application for assistance from the Insurance Fund may be made by the compact administrator for this state, whenever in the compact administrator's judgment the conditions qualifying this state for assistance exist and it would be in the best interest of this state to make a request.

